Rhode Island, session 2025, SB535.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 12-1.1-4 and 12-1.1-6 of the General Laws in Chapter 12-1.1 entitled
"State Crime Laboratory Commission" are hereby amended to read as follows:
12-1.1-4. Membership.
(a) The commission shall consist of five (5) nine (9) members: the attorney general; the
superintendent of state police; and a representative of the Rhode Island Police Chiefs Association
appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate; and two (2) public members
appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate: three (3) members with
expertise in law enforcement or criminal prosecution; three (3) members with expertise in criminal
defense; and three (3) members with expertise in scientific research. Appointed public members
shall serve two (2) year terms and shall be eligible to succeed themselves.
(b) Members shall serve until their successors are appointed and qualified. Each member
of the board may designate a subordinate within his or her department or agency to represent him
or her at all meetings of the board. Three (3) Five (5) members of the board shall constitute a
quorum and the vote of a majority of those present and voting shall be required for action.
(c) Members of the commission shall be removable by the governor pursuant to the
provisions of § 36-1-7 of the general laws and for cause only, and removal solely for partisan or
personal reasons unrelated to capacity or fitness for the office shall be unlawful.
12-1.1-6. Executive secretary.

The dean of the College of Pharmacy chair of the Department of Physics at the University
of Rhode Island shall serve as the executive secretary of the commission. The executive secretary
shall oversee the administration of the state crime laboratory, including all budgetary and personnel
matters, and shall provide timely reports to the commission regarding all matters pertaining to the
state crime laboratory.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001773
========
LC001773 - Page 2 of 3